North Carolina, session 2025, HB640.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 108A-55.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-55.5. Eligibility monitoring for medical public assistance.
(a) On at least a quarterly basis, the Department shall review information concerning
changes in circumstances that may affect medical assistance beneficiaries' eligibility to receive
medical assistance benefits. The Department shall share the information directly with, or make
the information available to, the county department of social services that determined the
beneficiary's eligibility.An individual may not be considered homeless to grant a work
requirement exemption until and unless the Department (i) verifies that an individual has resided
in a public shelter for a period of at least 30 days based on notarized documentation from a public
shelter of such fact or (ii) certifies that there is no indoor shelter available and provides notarized
documentation from a public housing authority that the individual is on a waiting list for benefits.
(a1) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Governmental public assistance entity. – An entity providing public
assistance, including the Department of Health and Human Services and
public housing authorities.
(2) Health and medical assistance programs. – The following programs:
a. Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, or food stamps.
b. Temporary Assistance for Needy Families and Children, also known
as Work First.
c. Medicaid.
(3) Homeless individual. – An individual who (i) has resided in a public shelter
for a period of at least 30 days or (ii) has no indoor shelter available and is on
the waiting list of a public housing authority for benefits.
(4) Public assistance. – The following programs:
a. Health and medical assistance.
b. Public housing assistance provided by a public housing authority.
(5) Public housing authority. – A housing authority operating within the State
created pursuant to G.S. 157-4.
(b) The information reviewed by the Department shall include all of the following:
(1) Earned and unearned income.
(2) Employment status and changes in employment.
*H640-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Residency status.
(4) Enrollment status in other State-administered public assistance programs.
(5) Financial resources.
(6) Incarceration status.
(7) Death records.
(8) Lottery winnings.
(9) Enrollment status in public assistance programs outside of this State.
(b1) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families and Children, Medicaid. – Governmental public assistance entities shall take the steps
with respect to the sources listed in this subsection as follows:
(1) With respect to State databases:
a. On at least a monthly basis, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall enter into a data matching agreement with the North
Carolina State Lottery Commission to identify households with
winnings of three thousand dollars ($3,000) or more from the lottery
or from gambling and, to the extent permissible under federal law, treat
this data as verified upon receipt. To the extent the data may not be
verified upon receipt, the Department shall make referrals for further
investigation to identify households with winnings equal to or greater
than the resource limit for elderly or disabled households as defined in
7 C.F.R. § 273.8(b).
b. On at least a monthly basis, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall receive and review information from the North Carolina
Office of Vital Records concerning individuals in households enrolled
in health and medical assistance programs that indicates a change in
circumstances that may affect eligibility for these programs.
c. On at least a quarterly basis, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall receive and review information from the Department of
Labor concerning individuals in households enrolled in health and
medical assistance programs that indicates a change in circumstances
that may affect eligibility for these programs, including, but not
limited to, changes in employment or wages.
d. On at least a monthly basis, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall receive and review information concerning individuals
in households enrolled in health and medical assistance programs that
indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for these
programs, including, but not limited to, potential changes in residency
as identified by out-of-state electronic benefit transfer (EBT) card
transactions.
e. On at least a quarterly basis, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall receive and review information from the Department of
Revenue concerning individuals in households enrolled in health and
medical assistance programs that indicates a change in circumstances
that may affect eligibility for these programs, including, but not
limited to, potential changes in income, wages, or residency as
identified by tax records.
f. On at least a monthly basis, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall receive and review information from the Department of
Adult Correction concerning individuals in households enrolled in
health and medical assistance programs that indicates a change in
circumstances that may affect eligibility for either program.
Page 2 House Bill 640-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
g. On at least a semimonthly basis, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall receive and review information from the Department of
Commerce concerning individuals in households enrolled in health
and medical assistance programs that indicates a change in
circumstances that may affect eligibility for these programs, including,
but not limited to, potential changes in employment, income, or assets.
(2) With respect to federal databases, on at least a monthly basis, the Department
of Health and Human Services shall review and act on findings affecting
eligibility for health and medical assistance programs with respect to the
following:
a. Earned income information, death register information, incarceration
records, supplemental security income information, beneficiary
records, earnings information, and pension information maintained by
the United States Social Security Administration.
b. Income and employment information maintained in the National
Directory of New Hires database and child support enforcement data
maintained by the United States Department of Health and Human
Services.
c. Payment and earnings information maintained by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development.
d. National fleeing felon information maintained by the United States
Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(3) With respect to annual retail site inspections, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall, with all necessary coordination with appropriate
federal and State law enforcement authorities, conduct an on-site inspection
of retailers that accept EBT card transactions to identify suspicious transaction
records or amounts indicating possible trafficking of benefits or other criminal
conduct and make referrals for proper investigations under applicable law.
(b2) Public Posting. – On at least a quarterly basis, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall make available to the public on its website data from findings of noncompliance
and fraud investigations in health and medical assistance programs for the following aggregate
and nonconfidential and nonpersonal identifying information:
(1) The number of households investigated for intentional program violations or
fraud.
(2) The total number of households referred to the Attorney General's office for
prosecution.
(3) The total amount of improper payments and expenditures.
(4) The total amount of monies recovered.
(5) Aggregate data concerning improper payments and ineligible recipients as a
percentage of those investigated and reviewed.
(6) The aggregate amount of funds expended by electronic benefit transfer card
transactions in each state outside of North Carolina.
(b3) Medicaid Application. – Unless required under federal law, the Department may not
accept self-attestation of income, residency, age, household composition, caretaker or relative
status, or receipt of other coverage without verification prior to enrollment or renewal of or in
Medicaid. In addition, the Department may not request authority to waive or decline to
periodically check any available income-related data sources to verify eligibility.
Unless required under federal law, the Department shall verify all conditions of eligibility for
Medicaid prior to enrollment and may not conduct post-enrollment verification without specific
authorization set forth in enactments by the General Assembly.
House Bill 640-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b4) Public Housing. – Governmental public assistance entities shall take the steps with
respect to the sources listed in this subsection as follows:
(1) With respect to State databases:
a. On at least a monthly basis, public housing authorities shall enter into
a data matching agreement with the North Carolina State Lottery
Commission identifying individuals in households with lottery or
gambling winnings of three thousand dollars ($3,000) or more.
b. On at least a monthly basis, public housing authorities shall receive
and review information from the North Carolina Office of Vital
Records concerning individuals in households which receive housing
assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect
eligibility for housing assistance, including, but not limited to, death
records.
c. On at least a quarterly basis, public housing authorities shall receive
and review information from the Department of Labor concerning
individuals in households which receive housing assistance that
indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for
housing assistance, including, but not limited to, changes in
employment or wages.
d. On at least a monthly basis, public housing authorities shall receive
and review information from the Department of Health and Human
Services concerning individuals in households which receive housing
assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect
eligibility for housing assistance, including, but not limited to,
potential changes in residency as identified by out-of-state electronic
benefit transfer (EBT) card transactions.
e. On at least a quarterly basis, public housing authorities shall receive
and review information from the Department of Revenue concerning
individuals in households which receive housing assistance that
indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for
housing assistance, including, but not limited to, potential changes in
income, wages, or residency as identified by tax records.
f. On at least a monthly basis, public housing authorities shall receive
and review information from the Department of Adult Correction
concerning individuals in households which receive housing
assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect
eligibility.
g. On at least a semimonthly basis, public housing authorities shall
receive and review information from the Department of Commerce
concerning individuals in households which receive housing
assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect
eligibility for housing assistance, including, but not limited to,
potential changes in employment, income, or assets.
(2) With respect to federal databases, on at least a monthly basis, public housing
authorities shall review and act on findings affecting eligibility for public
housing assistance programs with respect to the information listed in
subdivision (b1)(2) of this section.
(3) At least once per year, each public housing authority shall submit a report to
the Attorney General detailing its child support cooperation requirement. Each
report must contain all of the following:
Page 4 House Bill 640-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. A list of departments the public housing authority has data sharing
agreements with.
b. A summary of the data received at each time interval required by this
subsection.
c. The number of individuals flagged for eligibility issues during each
quarterly or monthly review of the data.
d. The number of individuals removed from public housing assistance as
a result of issues flagged during the data review.
(4) The Attorney General shall determine and enforce compliance with the
provisions of this section. Any public housing authority that does not
implement the data checks required by this section shall be deemed to be out
of compliance with the requirements of this section. The Attorney General
shall publish an annual report detailing each public housing authority's
compliance from the previous year. The first instance in which the Attorney
General finds that a public housing authority is out of compliance with this
section, the public housing authority shall submit a corrective action plan to
implement the requirements under this section within 12 months. A second
finding of noncompliance that occurs more than eight years after the first
finding of noncompliance shall be treated as the first finding of
noncompliance. The second instance in which the Attorney General finds that
a public housing authority is out of compliance with this section, the public
housing authority shall have its charter under Chapter 157 of the General
Statutes revoked and cease to operate in this State.
(c) A county department of social services The Department of Health and Human
Services and public housing authorities shall promptly review the information provided or made
available by the Department in accordance with subsection (a) subsections (a) through (b4) of
this section to determine if the information indicates a change in circumstances that may affect a
medical public assistance beneficiary's eligibility to receive medical public assistance benefits
and take one of the following actions:
(1) If a review of the information does not result in the county department of
social services Department of Health and Human Services or public housing
authority finding a discrepancy or change in a beneficiary's circumstances that
may affect that beneficiary's eligibility to receive medical public assistance
benefits, the county department of social services Department of Health and
Human Services or public housing authority shall take no further action.
(2) If a review of the information does result in the county department of social
services Department of Health and Human Services or public housing
authority finding a discrepancy or change in a beneficiary's circumstances that
may affect that beneficiary's eligibility for medical public assistance benefits,
the county department of social services Department of Health and Human
Services or public housing authority shall provide written notice to the
beneficiary that describes in sufficient detail the circumstances of the
discrepancy or change in circumstances that would affect the beneficiary's
eligibility for medical public assistance benefits. The notice must include the
following information:
a. The beneficiary will have 12 calendar days from the time of mailing
to respond.
b. A response from the beneficiary must be in writing.
c. Self-declarations made by the beneficiary will not be accepted as
verification of information in the response.
d. The consequences of taking no action.
House Bill 640-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) After the expiration of 12 calendar days from the time of mailing the notice required
under subsection (c) of this section, the county department of social services Department of
Health and Human Services or public housing authority shall take one of the following
actions:actions within 60 days of receiving the public assistance beneficiary's written
disagreement:
(1) If a beneficiary did not respond to the notice, the county department of social
services Department of Health and Human Services or public housing
authority shall redetermine the beneficiary's eligibility for medical public
assistance benefits and provide the beneficiary with proper notice under
G.S. 108A-79.
(2) If a beneficiary responds to the notice and disagrees with the information in
the notice, the county department of social services Department of Health and
Human Services or public housing authority shall reinvestigate the matter and
take one of the following actions:
a. If the county department of social services Department of Health and
Human Services or public housing authority determines that there has
been an error and the beneficiary's eligibility to receive medical public
assistance benefits is not affected, then no further action shall be taken.
b. If the county department of social services Department of Health and
Human Services or public housing authority determines that there is
no error, the county department of social services Department of
Health and Human Services or public housing authority shall
redetermine the beneficiary's eligibility for medical public assistance
benefits and provide the beneficiary with proper notice under
G.S. 108A-79.
(3) If a beneficiary responds to the notice and confirms the information in the
notice is correct, then the county department of social services Department of
Health and Human Services or public housing authority shall redetermine the
beneficiary's eligibility for medical public assistance benefits and provide the
beneficiary with proper notice under G.S. 108A-79.
If, at any time after receiving a beneficiary's response to the notice, the county department of
social services Department of Health and Human Services or public housing authority determines
that there is a risk of fraud or misrepresentation or inadequate documentation, then the county
department of social services may request additional documentation from the beneficiary.
(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude the Department or any county department of
social services public housing authority from receiving or reviewing additional information
related to a beneficiary's eligibility for medical public assistance benefits that is obtained in a
manner other than that provided for under this section.
(f) The Department of Health and Human Services and public housing authorities shall
have the authority to execute a memorandum of understanding with any department, agency, or
division for information required to be shared between agencies outlined in this section.
(g) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Department of Health and Human Services
or a public housing authority from contracting with one or more independent vendors to provide
additional data or information which may indicate a change in circumstances that may affect
eligibility.
(h) The Department of Health and Human Services shall promulgate all rules and
regulations necessary for the purposes of carrying out this section."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026.
Page 6 House Bill 640-First Edition